Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.460

Presumption that landlord or lessor can control delivery—Remedies for nondelivery or breach.

In any action upon such marketing agreements, it shall be conclusively presumed that a landlord or lessor is able to control the delivery of fishery products produced by his or her equipment by tenants, or others, whose tenancy or possession or work on such equipment or the terms of whose tenancy or possession or labor thereon were created or changed after execution by the landlord or lessor, of such a marketing agreement; and in such actions, the foregoing remedies for nondelivery or breach shall lie and be enforceable against such landlord or lessor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 682; 1959 c 312 s 46.]